Hawaii statutes.
[§328C-7] Recordkeeping. [Section
repealed on July 1, 2010. L 2004, c 190, §11.] (a) All previously
dispensed prescription drugs donated to repository entities shall be recorded
by the institutional facility. Records shall be retained by the institutional
facility for five years and shall include the following information:

(1) The name and address of the donating
institutional facility;

(2) The name and strength of the drug;

(3) The name of the manufacturer or the national drug
code;

(4) The quantity of the drug;

(5) The expiration or use by date of the drug;

(6) The date the drug was sent to the repository
entity or any other agent for final disposition;

(7) The name of the repository entity, or any other
agent that received or is to receive the drug for final disposition and a
description of the disposition, such as donated, disposed, or destroyed; and

(8) The initials of the person making the entry.

(b) The institutional facility's records of
drugs subject to donation to repository entities shall be copied and used as a
manifest for the products sent to the recipient repository entity.

(c) All institutional facility and repository
records shall be subject to audit by agents of the director of human services
or director of health. [L 2004, c 190, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next